District of Columbia statutes.
29A-101.138

Repealed

Certificates and certified copies of certain documents to be received in evidence.

Repealed.

June 8, 1954, 68 Stat. 234, ch. 269, § 138
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-101.138.
1981 Ed., § 29-399.39.
1973 Ed., § 29-949.